Hawaii statutes.
§264-15 Highway advance acquisition; source
of funds. The director may, with the approval of the governor, expend
moneys appropriated by the legislature as may be necessary for the acquisition
of real property when the director determines:

(1) The acquisition of the real property is necessary
for a state highway project authorized by the legislature;

(2) Funds previously authorized by the legislature
are inadequate; and

(3) That any delay in the acquisition of such
property would unnecessarily increase the cost of the highway project;

provided that the selected corridor and alignment of
the project shall have been approved by the governor.

All moneys received from the rental, sale, or
lease of any property acquired under this section shall be paid into the state
general fund; provided that whenever federal funds are involved in the
acquisition of the property, any money received from the sale, lease, or rental
of such property shall be expended toward the project for which the property
was acquired. [L 1971, c 132, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 280, §54]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next